Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Article 8. Severance Tax Distributions

§ 39-14-801.
Severance tax distributions; distribution account created; formula.

There is created the severance tax distribution account into which shall be credited revenues from severance taxes as provided by law. Interest on earnings from funds in the account shall be credited to the general fund.

Before making distributions from the severance tax distribution account under subsections (c) through (e) of this section, an amount equal to two-thirds (2/3) of the amount of tax collected under W.S. 39-14-104(a)(i) and (b)(i) and 39-14-204(a)(i) for the same period shall be deposited as follows:

through (iii) Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 144, § 3.

For fiscal years 2021 and 2022, these funds shall be deposited to the one percent severance tax account;

For fiscal year 2023 through fiscal year 2028 these funds shall be deposited equally to the permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund and to the common school account within the permanent land fund;

For fiscal year 2029 and thereafter these funds shall be deposited two-thirds (2/3) to the permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund and one-third (1/3) to the common school account within the permanent land fund.

[LUST] Before making distributions from the severance tax distribution account under subsections (d) and (e) of this section, an amount equal to the amount of tax collected under W.S. 39-17-104(a)(iii) and 39-17-204(a)(ii) for the same period shall be distributed to the corrective action account created by W.S.

35-11-1424

and to the financial responsibility account created by W.S.

35-11-1427

in an inverse proportion to the amount in the two (2) accounts.

After making distributions pursuant to subsections (b), (c), (f) and (j) of this section, distributions under subsection (e) of this section shall be made from the severance tax distribution account. The amount of distributions under subsection (e) of this section shall not exceed one hundred fifty-five million dollars ($ 155,000,000.00) in any fiscal year. To the extent that distributions under subsection (e) of this section would exceed that amount in any fiscal year, except as provided in subsections (g), (h) and (k) of this section, the excess shall be credited:

One-third (1/3) to the general fund; and

Two-thirds (2/3) to the budget reserve account.

Deposits into the account created by subsection (a) of this section shall be distributed as follows, subject to subsections (b) through (d) and (f) of this section:

To the general fund, sixty-two and twenty-six hundredths percent (62.26%);

To water development account I under W.S. 41-2-124(a)(i), twelve and forty-five hundredths percent (12.45%);

To water development account II under W.S. 41-2-124(a)(ii), two and one tenth percent (2.1%);

To the highway fund, except for the fiscal years commencing July 1, 2016 and July 1, 2017, four and thirty-three hundredths percent (4.33%), except that if the total unencumbered revenues within the state park road account created by W.S.

24-14-102

are less than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00) on July 1, 2001 or on July 1 of any even-numbered year thereafter, the state treasurer shall first distribute revenues to that account in an amount equal to five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000.00) less the total unencumbered revenues in the account on July 1 of that year. For the fiscal years commencing July 1, 2016 and July 1, 2017 funds under this paragraph shall be distributed to the general fund;

To counties, seventy-eight hundredths percent (0.78%), subject to the following formula:

Fifty percent (50%) of the funds distributed under this paragraph shall be distributed to the counties in the same proportion that the population of the county bears to the population of the state; and

Fifty percent (50%) of the funds distributed under this paragraph shall be distributed to the counties based upon the inverse of the assessed valuation of each county as computed under subparagraph (vii)(C) of this subsection.

To counties, three and one-tenth percent (3.1%), each county to receive an amount in the proportion which the population of the county bears to total state population;

To the road construction and maintenance funds of the various counties as provided by W.S.

24-2-110

, two and nine-tenths percent (2.9%), except that each county’s share of funds under this subsection shall be computed as follows:

One-third (1/3) shall be distributed to each county in the ratio that the population of the county bears to total state population;

One-third (1/3) shall be distributed to each county in the ratio that the mileage of county roads in the county bears to total county roads in Wyoming;

One-third (1/3) shall be distributed to each county as follows:

Arrange the assessed valuation of each county in descending order by county;

Calculate the county percentages of assessed valuation relative to total state valuation;

Calculate the inverse of the county percentage of total state assessed valuation by dividing one (1) by the percentage computed in subdivision (C)(II) of this paragraph;

Compute each county share by dividing each inverse calculated under subdivision (III) of this subparagraph by the total sum of the inverses calculated under subdivision (III) of this subparagraph.

To cities and towns, nine and twenty-five hundredths percent (9.25%), each city or town to receive an amount in the proportion which the population of the city or town bears to the population of all cities and towns in Wyoming;

To the capital construction account, two and thirty-three hundredths percent (2.33%), to be expended for the purposes specified in W.S. 9-4-604(k)(ii);

To the water development account III, five-tenths of one percent (.5%), to be expended for the purposes specified in W.S. 41-2-124(d).

Funds subject to subsection (b) of this section shall be deposited in accordance with that subsection unless specified otherwise by enactment of a general appropriations bill for state government as determined by the legislature to be necessary to alleviate a budget shortfall or structural budget deficit as defined by W.S.

9-2-1002

, or to provide appropriations to maintain services as determined by the legislature.

For fiscal year 2019, when distributions under paragraph (d)(ii) of this section equal one hundred thirty-seven million dollars ($137,000,000.00) additional funds that would otherwise be distributed under paragraphs (d)(i) and (ii) of this section shall be credited to the school foundation program reserve account and the budget reserve account in equal amounts until credits to the school foundation program reserve account for the fiscal year reach fifty million dollars ($50,000,000.00). If there are undistributed funds in the severance tax distribution account and the conditions of this subsection have been met, the excess shall be credited as follows:

One-third (1/3) to the general fund; and

Two-thirds (2/3) to the budget reserve account.

For fiscal year 2021, when distributions under paragraph (d)(ii) of this section equal one hundred thirty-one million eight hundred thousand dollars ($131,800,000.00) and for fiscal year 2022, when distributions under paragraph (d)(ii) of this section equal one hundred forty million seven hundred thousand dollars ($140,700,000.00), additional funds that would otherwise be distributed under paragraphs (d)(i) and (ii) of this section shall be credited to the school foundation program reserve account and the budget reserve account in equal amounts until the amount credited to the school foundation program reserve account under this subsection for the fiscal year reach fifty million dollars ($50,000,000.00). If there are undistributed funds in the severance tax distribution account and the conditions of this subsection have been met, the excess shall be credited as follows:

One-third (1/3) to the general fund; and

Two-thirds (2/3) to the budget reserve account.

The state treasurer shall withhold from any payment due to a city or county under this section an amount equal to any delinquent payment owed by a city or county under W.S. 15-5-203(h). The withheld amount shall be deposited to the legislative stabilization reserve account and credited against the delinquent entity’s unpaid loan amount.

For fiscal year 2023, when distributions under paragraph (d)(ii) of this section equal one hundred fifteen million five hundred thousand dollars ($ 115,500,000.00) and for fiscal year 2024, when distributions under paragraph (d)(ii) of this section equal one hundred two million two hundred thousand dollars ($ 102,200,000.00), additional funds that would otherwise be distributed under paragraphs (d)(i) and (ii) of this section shall be credited as follows:

One-third (1/3) to the general fund;

One-third (1/3) to the budget reserve account; and

One-third (1/3) to the school foundation program reserve account.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 97, § 2; 2001, ch. 209, §§ 1, 2(b); 2003, ch. 15, § 1; 2005, ch. 80, § 1; ch. 163, § 1; ch. 231, § 1; 2008, ch. 24, § 1; 2009, ch. 159, § 350; ch. 170, § 1; 2015 ch. 131, § 1, effective March 4, 2015; 2016 ch. 31, § 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2016 ch. 118, § 2, effective July 1, 2016; 2018 ch. 134, § 314(a), effective July 1, 2018; 2020 ch. 80, § 314(e), effective July 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 144, §§ 2, 3, effective July 1, 2021; 2022 ch. 8, § 2, effective April 1, 2022; 2022 ch. 51, § 314, effective July 1, 2022.

Cross references. —

As to requests by recipients of certain earmarked funds for additional funding from the budget reserve account, see §

9-2-1014

.1.

The 2005 amendments. —

The first
2005 amendment, by ch. 80, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, added (b), redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly, updated internal references, and made stylistic changes.

The second
2005 amendment, by ch. 163, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, substituted “two and thirty-three hundredths percent (2.33%)” for “two and eighty-three hundredths percent (2.83%)” in (d)(ix) (now (e)(ix)), and added (d)(x) (now (e)(x)).

The third
2005 amendment, by ch. 231, § 1, effective July 1, 2005, deleted “within the earmarked revenue fund” in the first sentence in (a).

See the conflicting legislation note. This section is set out incorporating amendments made by all three 2005 acts.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, inserted “and maintenance” after “construction” in the introductory language of (e)(vii).

The 2009 amendments. —

The first 2009 amendment, by Laws 2009, ch. 159, § 350, in (b), added the exception at the end; and added (b)(i) and (b)(ii).

Laws 2009, ch. 159, § 350, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 5, 2009.

The second 2009 amendment, by Laws 2009, ch. 170, § 1, effective July 1, 2009, in (e)(v)(A), deleted “as determined by the most recent federal decennial census” following “population of the state”; in (e)(vi), deleted “population to be determined by resort to the latest federal census as periodically updated by the bureau of the census” from the end; in (e)(vii)(A), deleted “based on the most recent decennial federal census” from the end; and in (e)(viii), deleted “population to be determined by resort to the latest federal census as periodically updated by the bureau of the census” from the end.

While neither
amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in
this section as set out above.

The 2015 amendment,

in (e)(v)(B), substituted “under this paragraph” for “under this subsection.”

Laws 2015, ch. 131, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2015.

The 2016 amendment

, effective July 1, 2016, in (d), substituted “pursuant to subsections (b), (c) and (f)” for “under subsections (b) and (c)”; in (e), inserted “and (f)” following “(b) through (d)”; and added (f).

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (b), substituted “June 30, 2020”
for “June 30, 2018”; added (b)(iii); in (d), inserted
“except as provided in subsection (g) of this section”
in the last sentence; and added (g).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in the introductory language of (b) substituted “June 30, 2022” for “June 30, 2020”; added (b)(iv); in the introductory language of (d) substituted “as provided in subsections (g) and (h)” for “as provided in subsection (g)”; and added (h).

The 2021 amendments. —

The first 2021 amendment, by ch. 144, § 2, effective July 1, 2021, deleted “into the permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund, except for the period from March 15, 2016 through June 30, 2022 these funds shall be deposited” following “shall be deposited” in (b); and added (b)(v) and (b)(vi).

The second 2021 amendment, by ch. 144, § 2, effective July 1, 2021, repealed (b)(i) through (iii), which read, “(i) For distributions made for the period from March 15, 2016 through the end of fiscal year 2016 these funds shall be deposited in the general fund; (ii) For fiscal years 2017 and 2018, these funds shall be deposited to the one percent severance tax account; (iii) For fiscal years 2019 and 2020, these funds shall be deposited to the general fund.”

The 2022 amendments. —

The first 2022 amendment, by ch. 8, § 2, effective April 1, 2022, in the introductory language of (d), added “and (j)” following “(f),” made related changes; and added (j).

The second 2022 amendment, by ch. 51, § 314, effective July 1, 2022, in the introductory language of (d), added “and (k)” in the last sentence, made related changes; and added (k).

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 170, § 3, provides: “(a)
No authority to issue any license based upon population shall be diminished by application of this act until the 2010 federal decennial census has been conducted and officially released by the bureau of census.

“(b)
No distribution of funding shall be diminished or increased based upon application of this act until the 2010 federal decennial census has been conducted and officially released by the bureau of census.
To the extent any entity's share of funding would be reduced or increased by application of this act before that time, the distribution of funds shall be administered in accordance with the provisions of law prior to the amendment or repeal of such law by this act.”

Laws 2016, ch. 118 § 3, provides:
“To the extent any provision of this act conflicts with any provision of 2016 Senate File 0001, as enacted into law, the provisions of Senate File 0001 shall control for the fiscal biennium commencing July 1, 2016 and ending June 30, 2018. This section shall not be interpreted to relieve the governor, legislature or any committee of the legislature from taking any action required in this act.
The governor may exercise authority granted under 2016 Senate File 0001 or this act in order to avoid a budget shortfall as defined in
W.S.

9-2-1002

for the fiscal biennium commencing July 1, 2016 and ending June 30, 2018.”

Appropriations. —

See Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 341, as added by Laws 2005, ch. 191, § 4, for various distributions from the general fund to local governments and state accounts.

Laws 2005, ch. 191, § 400, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2005.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 39-14-802.
Advanced conversion technologies research account created; funds deposited; use of funds.

There is created the advanced conversion technologies research account into which shall be deposited revenues as provided by law. Interest on earnings from funds in the account shall be credited to the account.

Deposits into the account created by subsection (a) of this section shall only be expended pursuant to W.S. 21-17-121(f). Funds deposited in the account shall not be expended until a dollar for dollar match has been provided from nonstate of Wyoming public funds. Notwithstanding W.S.

9-2-1008

or

9-4-207

, unexpended funds shall not revert.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 186, § 1; 2009, ch. 57, § 2; 2012, ch. 12, § 1.

The 2009 amendment,

in (b), substituted “pursuant to W.S. 21-17-121(f)” for “upon appropriation by the legislature”, and added the last two sentences.

Laws 2009, ch. 57, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 26, 2009.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “advanced conversion technologies” for “clean coal” in (a).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2009, ch. 57, § 5 provides: “(a) Any funds remaining from the appropriation provided in 2007 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 186, Section 3(b), as amended by 2008 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 48, Section 325(b) are hereby reappropriated to the account created under W.S.

39-14-802

for the purpose of clean coal technology research.

“(b) Any funds remaining under the appropriation provided in 2007 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 186, Section 3(a) are hereby reappropriated to the governor's office for expenses incurred by the clean coal task force.

“(c) There is appropriated seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500.00) from the general fund to the legislative service office for compensation of legislative members serving on the clean coal task force.

“(d) Funds appropriated under subsections (b) and (c) of this section are appropriated for the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2010. These appropriations shall only be expended for the purpose of staffing the clean coal task force and for expenses incurred by the clean coal task force. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the appropriation under subsection (a) of this section shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall not revert as provided by law on June 30, 2010. The appropriations under subsections (b) and (c) of this section shall be included in the governor's and the legislative service office's 2011-2012 standard biennial budget requests.”

Effective dates. —

Laws 2007, ch. 186, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2007.